src/egy_lex/prep.lexc
!!!prep.lexc!!!

LEXICON Root
Prep;

LEXICON PrepInf
0:0 #;

+ك:^ك #;
+ي:^ي #;
+كي:^كي #;
+كو:^كو #;
+ه:^ه #;
+ها:^ها #;
+نا:^نا #;
+هم:^هم #;

LEXICON Prep
عند PrepInf;
ب PrepInf;
مع PrepInf;
ل PrepInf;
على PrepInf;
فوق PrepInf;
فى PrepInf;
بعد PrepInf;
زي PrepInf;
حوالي PrepInf;
ورا PrepInf;
جوا PrepInf;
قدام PrepInf;
من PrepInf;
عن PrepInf;
تحت PrepInf;
قصاد PrepInf;
قبال PrepInf;
جمب PrepInf;
بين PrepInf;
بتاع PrepInf;
حولين PrepInf;
حسب PrepInf;
عكس PrepInf;
الا PrepInf;
